gl_ES.dic
dicir/634,636,637,638,734,736,737,738 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:dixer
dixer/666,638,639,738,739 st:dicir is:alomorfo dicir transitiva / intransitiva
maldixer/666,638,639,738,739 st:maldicir is:alomorfo maldicir transitiva / intransitiva
